tugas morphology/indo.foma
# Vowels
define Vokal [a | e | i | o | u ];

read lexc indo.lexc
define Lexicon;

define NInsertion [..] -> men || .#. _ c|j|d|z ;
define KReplacement k -> meng || .#. _ ;
define NGInsertion [..] -> meng || .#. _ Vokal|g|h|q ;
define PReplacement p -> mem || .#. _ ;
define SReplacement s -> meny || .#. _ ;
define TReplacement t -> men || .#. _ ;
define MInsertion [..] -> mem || .#. _ b|f|v ;
define MEInsertion [..] -> me || .#. _ l|m|r|n|w|x|y ;
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o.
      NInsertion .o.
      NGInsertion .o.
      KReplacement .o.
      PReplacement .o.
      SReplacement .o.
      TReplacement .o.
      MInsertion .o.
      MEInsertion .o.
      Cleanup;
